Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions
45-20-9.
Procedure for hearings and appeals relating to adverse personnel actions.

Any laws to the contrary notwithstanding, all hearings on dismissals, other adverse personnel actions, and other purported violations of the rules and regulations as applied to classified employees shall be instituted by filing a written appeal with the Office of State Administrative Hearings upon such ground and in such form and under such procedure as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the office. The party appealing and the department from whose action the appeal is taken shall be notified in writing within 15 days from the filing of the appeal that an appeal has been filed and the time for which a hearing is scheduled.

The State Personnel Board, any member of the board, or an administrative law judge shall have the authority to do the following in connection with any hearing on a dismissal or other purported violation of the rules and regulations: administer oaths and affirmations; sign and issue subpoenas; rule upon offers of proof; regulate the course of the hearing, set the time and place for continued hearings, and fix the time for filing briefs; dispose of motions to dismiss for lack of the board’s jurisdiction over the subject matter or parties or for any other ground; dispose of motions to amend or to intervene; provide for the taking of testimony by deposition or interrogatory; and reprimand or exclude from the hearing any person for any indecorous or improper conduct committed in the presence of the board or the administrative law judge.

Subpoenas shall be issued without discrimination between public and private parties. When a subpoena is disobeyed, any party may apply to the superior court of the county where the hearing is being held for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with such order shall be cause for punishment as for contempt of court. The costs of securing the attendance of witnesses, including fees and mileage, shall be computed and assessed in the same manner as prescribed by law in civil cases in the superior court. Once issued a subpoena may be quashed by the board or an administrative law judge if it appears that the subpoena was used primarily as a means of harassment, that the testimony or documents sought are cumulative, that the testimony or documents sought are not relevant, that the testimony or documents sought are not material, that to respond to the subpoena would be unduly burdensome, or that for other good reasons basic fairness dictates that the subpoena should not be enforced.

With respect to all hearings before the board or the administrative law judge:

Irrelevant, immaterial, or unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. The rules of evidence as applied in the trial of civil nonjury cases in the superior courts of Georgia shall be followed. Evidence not admissible thereunder may be admitted if it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent persons in the conduct of their affairs. The board shall give effect to the rules of privilege recognized by law. Objections to evidentiary offers may be made and shall be noted in the record. Subject to these requirements, when a hearing will be expedited and the interests of the parties will not be prejudiced substantially, any part of the evidence may be received in written form;

Documentary evidence may be received in the form of copies or excerpts if the original is not readily available. Upon request and at the discretion of the administrative law judge or board, parties shall be given an opportunity to compare the copy with the original;

A party may conduct such cross-examination as shall be required for a full and true disclosure of the facts; and

Official notice may be taken of judicially recognizable facts. In addition, official notice may be taken of technical facts within the board’s specialized knowledge. Parties shall be notified either before or during the hearing by reference in preliminary reports or otherwise of the material officially noticed, including any staff memoranda or data; and they shall be afforded an opportunity to contest the material so noticed. The board’s experience, technical competence, and specialized knowledge may be utilized in the evaluation of the evidence.

With respect to hearings at which the board did not preside at the presentation of the evidence, the administrative law judge who presided shall issue an initial decision within 30 days from the close of the evidence or if necessary within a longer period of time as ordered by the board or the administrative law judge. The initial decision shall be transmitted to the board, and copies shall be sent to the parties or their representatives. In the absence of an application for review from an adversely affected party to the board within 30 days from the date the initial decision was issued or in the absence of an order by the board within such time for review on its own motion, the decision shall become the decision of the board without further proceedings or notice; and any right of additional appeals shall be extinguished.

On review of the entire record from the administrative law judge, the board shall have all the powers it would have in presiding at the reception of the evidence, including the review of any motions granted or denied by the administrative law judge and including the review of any action taken by the administrative law judge. Both parties shall have the right to present oral arguments to the board. Any presentation to the board on the matter by an administrative law judge shall be made in the presence of the parties. No administrative law judge shall be present during the board’s deliberations and voting on the application. At its discretion, the board may take additional testimony or remand the matter to the administrative law judge for such purpose.

Unless precluded by law, informal disposition of any proceeding before the board or the administrative law judge may be made by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order, or default.

As a part of the initial decision or order subsequent to any hearing, the administrative law judge or the board shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law separately stated and the effective date of the decision or order. Findings of fact, if set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. Copies of the decision or order shall be mailed to all parties of record.

Any party, including the state and any state board, bureau, commission, or department, who has exhausted all administrative remedies available before the board and who is aggrieved by a final decision or order of the board on any hearing may seek judicial review of the final decision or order of the board in the superior court of the county of the place of employment of the employee.

Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition with the court within 30 days after the decision or order is rendered. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the board and all parties of record. The petition shall state the nature of the petitioner’s interest, the facts showing that the petitioner is aggrieved by the decision of the board, and the grounds upon which the petitioner contends the decision or order should be reversed or remanded. The petition may be amended with leave of court.

Within 30 days after the service of the petition or within further time allowed by the court, the board shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceeding under review. By stipulation of all parties to the review proceeding the record may be shortened. A party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the record may be taxed by the court for the additional costs. The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

The filing of the petition shall stay the enforcement of the board’s decision or order.

If before the date set for hearing the appeal by the superior court application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and there were good reasons for failure to present it in the proceedings before the board, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the board upon conditions determined by the court. The board may modify its findings and decision or order by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or decisions and orders with the reviewing court.

The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the board as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision or order of the board or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse the decision or order of the board if substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the board’s findings, inferences, conclusions, decisions, or orders are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the board;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

A party aggrieved by an order of the court in a proceeding authorized under this Code section may appeal to the Supreme Court of Georgia or the Court of Appeals of Georgia in accordance with Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 5.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 780, §§ 5-7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1997, p. 844, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 823, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 8/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-10.
Collection, compilation, consolidation, and submission of certain personnel data.

The DOAS shall routinely collect from agencies required under law to submit a quarterly budget to the Office of Planning and Budget data including the number of personnel, salaries, length of service, distribution of employees by filled and unfilled full-time employee positions at the budgetary program level, and other pertinent personnel information for the subsequent fiscal year as prescribed by the Governor. The commissioner shall compile, consolidate, and submit the data to the Office of Planning and Budget as needed.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 8; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1998, p. 823, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-11 and 45-20-12.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections, concerning audits of State Personnel Administration, reports of audit findings, implementation of leadership development courses, and the Governor’s Executive Leadership Institute were based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 338; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1120, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 32/SB 49; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 9/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, §§ 1, 2/SB 97.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-13 and 45-20-14.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, §§ 10, 11/SB 230, effective May 12, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections, concerning penalties for violations of article or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder generally, the effect of misdemeanor conviction and the rights of merit system officers and employees continued, were based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, §§ 11, 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, reenacted the reservation of these Code sections without change.

45-20-15.
[Reserved] Confidentiality of information received by staff in counseling; exceptions.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

45-20-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 583, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 12/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, §§ 1, 3/SB 97.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-16.
Rules for accrual of leave, holidays, and compensation for closing of state offices; utilization of accumulated sick leave; conversion to and use of personal leave; disapproval, contesting and reacquisition of sick leave.

As a part of employee compensation, the board shall establish rules for the accrual and usage of leave and holidays and for compensation due to emergency closure of state offices or facilities for nontemporary employees. All agencies of the executive branch, exclusive of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, shall provide for the accrual and usage of leave and holidays and for compensation due to emergency closure of state offices or facilities for nontemporary employees in accordance with such rules.

Any employee who has accumulated sick leave shall be authorized to utilize such sick leave in accordance with the criteria established in the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board; provided, however, that whenever an employee is sick and absent from work, the employee may be required to report each day by telephone to the appropriate authority. An employee shall not be required to provide documentation for the use of less than 17 hours of sick leave in any 30 day period, unless the employee has demonstrated excessive or abusive use of sick leave. The State Personnel Board shall establish rules and regulations that define excessive or abusive use.

An employee who has accrued more than 15 days of sick leave as of November 30 of any year may, by written notification to the appointing authority by no later than December 31 of that year, convert up to three days of accrued sick leave in excess of 15 days to personal leave. Any personal leave not used by December 31 of the following year, or upon termination, shall be forfeited and not restored to the employee.

Personal leave may be used by the employee for personal reasons the same as annual leave upon approval by the employee’s appointing authority. The employee shall normally be required to provide the appointing authority with a 24 hour advance notice for use of personal leave. Every reasonable effort shall be made by the appointing authority to accommodate employees on their requests for use of personal leave.

If the appointing authority disagrees with the claim of sickness or need to utilize sick leave made by the employee pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, the appointing authority may disapprove the use of such sick leave in accordance with the criteria established in the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. The employee may contest the disapproval of the sick leave through the department’s employee complaint procedure.

Any nontemporary employee in classified or unclassified service who forfeits accumulated sick leave as a result of withdrawal from employment with the state shall be entitled to regain such accumulated sick leave after such employee returns to state employment and remains in service for a period of two consecutive years.

The State Personnel Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section. The leave regulations of the board in effect on July 1, 1991, and not in conflict with this Code section shall remain in effect until amended, changed, modified, or repealed by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1582, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1341, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 721, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 13/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2021, see Executive Orders 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-17.
Parental leave; requirements for implementation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Eligible employee” means:

Any individual identified in subparagraph (A), (E), (F), (G), or (L) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 45-18-1 who is classified as full-time by the applicable state employing entity; or

Any individual identified in paragraph (4) of Code Section 20-2-880 or paragraph (3) of Code Section 20-2-910 who is classified as full-time by the applicable local board of education.

“Employing entity” means:

The executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government; or

A local board of education.

“Qualifying life event” means:

The birth of a child of an eligible employee;

The placement of a minor child for adoption with an eligible employee; or

The placement of a minor child for foster care with an eligible employee.

All eligible employees of an employing entity shall be eligible for paid parental leave for qualifying life events after six continuous months of employment with the employing entity regardless of whether the employee is eligible for paid or unpaid leave under federal law. Such paid parental leave shall be equally available to all eligible employees.

The maximum amount of paid parental leave that may be taken by an eligible employee during a rolling 12 month period is 120 hours, regardless of the number of qualifying life events that occur within such period. The rolling 12 month period shall be measured backward from the date an eligible employee first uses parental leave. Such leave may be used as needed and may be taken in increments of less than eight hours. Any such leave that remains 12 months after the qualifying life event shall not carry over for future use.

Unused paid parental leave shall have no cash value at the time of the eligible employee’s separation from employment with the employing entity.

Each employing entity shall promulgate rules for the administration of paid parental leave under this Code section for eligible employees which are not in conflict with this Code section; provided, however, that the State Personnel Board shall promulgate such rules for any employing entity that is considered a department or agency as such terms are synonymously defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 45-20-2. At a minimum, such rules of the employing entity shall address:

Whether paid parental leave under this Code section shall run concurrently with any leave provided under federal law; and

The documentation, if any, that an eligible employee shall be required to provide to establish the existence of a qualifying life event.

To implement paid parental leave under this Code section, the State Accounting Office shall make any and all necessary adjustments to its current and any future human capital management software, websites, and platforms used by participating employing entities to ensure that paid parental leave appears as a new benefit leave category not later than July 1, 2021.

An eligible employee employed on an hourly basis shall be eligible for paid parental leave under this Code section if he or she has worked a minimum of 700 hours over the six-month period immediately preceding the requested paid parental leave date.

Provided that the use of paid parental leave is not likely to unduly disrupt the employing entity’s operations, no employing entity shall interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of or the attempt to exercise the provisions of this Code section by any eligible employee. No employing entity shall discharge or in any other manner discriminate or retaliate against any eligible employee for lawfully exercising the provisions of this Code section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, nothing shall prevent an employing entity from taking an adverse employment action against an eligible employee who submits a false or fraudulent document or otherwise provides false or fraudulent information in an attempt to obtain paid parental leave under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 491, § 1/HB 146.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, “not later than July 1, 2021” was substituted for “not later than the effective date of this Code section” at the end of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to interdepartmental transfers.
The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 732, § 4 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 14/SB 230, effective May 12, 2008.
Additionally, Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, reenacted the reservation of this former Code section without change.

45-20-18.
Loss of eligibility for wage incentive payment due to abuse of member of public.

Any state employee who commits a validated act of abuse towards a member of the public while performing employment duties shall not be eligible for any wage incentive payment during the period such act occurred.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1081, § 1A; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

45-20-19.
Termination or elimination of
positions or employees through reduction in force.

This subsection shall apply whenever any department or agency proposes to terminate the employment of one or more classified employees through a reduction in force. No termination subject to this subsection shall become effective until at least 30 days after the affected employee has been notified in writing by the department or agency. Such notice must contain at a minimum:

A statement of the nature of the proposed action to be taken with respect to the affected employee;

An explanation of the rights of the affected employee due to the proposed reduction in force, including any right of appeal, or other opportunities regarding possible continued employment, any opportunities to apply for employment with any public or private party assuming the functions of the employee, or any other similar opportunities; and

An explanation of the affected employee’s rights and options regarding his or her employment benefits, including but not limited to any right to continued participation in any retirement system or insurance plan.

This subsection shall apply whenever any department or agency proposes to eliminate 25 or more positions or terminate 25 or more employees through a reduction in force. At least 15 days prior to giving the employee notice, the department or agency shall give written notice to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of the proposed reduction in force. Such notice shall:

Identify the facilities and operations to be affected and the estimated number of employees to be affected; and

State the reasons for the proposed action.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not apply to a reduction in force which must become effective immediately because the department or agency has insufficient funds available to pay the salaries of the affected employees.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 853, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 15/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-20.
Eligible employees must register with Selective Service System; exemptions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Employing unit” means that budget unit under the Appropriations Act through which an officer or employee receives compensation for services rendered as such officer or employee.

“Federal law” means Section 3(a) of the Military Selective Service Act (50 App. U.S.C.A. 451, et seq.).

A state officer, other than an elected officer whose office is created by the Constitution, shall not be eligible to take office if such person is a male between 18 and 26 years of age unless, prior to taking the oath of office, such person presents proof to the Secretary of State of having registered with the Selective Service System as required by federal law or of being exempt from such registration.

A person employed by the state before July 1, 1998, other than an officer specified or exempted by subsection (b) of this Code section, who is a male between 18 and 26 years of age shall be terminated for cause unless, by January 1, 1999, such person presents proof to the employing unit of state government of having registered with the Selective Service System as required by federal law or of being exempt from such registration.

A person shall not be hired as an employee of the state on or after July 1, 1998, other than an officer specified or exempted by subsection (b) of this Code section, if that person is a male between 18 and 26 years of age unless, prior to such hiring, such person presents proof to the employing unit of state government of having registered with the Selective Service System as required by federal law or of being exempt from such registration.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1031, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-21.
Performance management system.

The State Personnel Board shall provide for a performance management system for the periodic review and rating of the quality and quantity of work performed by employees. All agencies of the executive branch, exclusive of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, shall provide for the review and rating of the quality and quantity of work performed by employees.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 16/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.